Indiana, session 2026, HB1240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-6.1-1.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.2. As used in this chapter, "cremation" has the
meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-1-4.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. "Crematory" has the meaning set forth in
IC 23-14-31-11.
SECTION 3. IC 10-14-1-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. "Cremation" has the meaning set forth in
IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 4. IC 12-7-2-51.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 51.3. "Cremation" or "cremate", for purposes of
IC 12-20, has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 5. IC 16-18-2-88.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 88.4. "Cremation" or "cremate"
has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 6. IC 23-14-31-0.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.3. As used in this chapter,
"alkaline hydrolysis" means the dissolution of human remains by:
(1) placing the human remains in water and a chemical
solution that includes:
(A) potassium hydroxide;
(B) sodium hydroxide; or
(C) a combination of potassium hydroxide and sodium
hydroxide; and
(2) introducing heat;
to break down the human remains to only bone fragments that may
be pulverized and a liquid substance.
SECTION 7. IC 23-14-31-0.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.4. As used in this chapter,
"alkaline hydrolysis chamber" means an enclosed space that:
(1) is specifically created for alkaline hydrolysis; and
(2) is able to be completely sealed during alkaline hydrolysis.
SECTION 8. IC 23-14-31-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"alkaline hydrolysis facility" means a structure in which human
remains undergo, or are intended to undergo, alkaline hydrolysis.
SECTION 9. IC 23-14-31-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) As used in this
chapter, "cremated remains" means all human remains recovered after
the completion of the cremation of a human body or body part,
including the residue of any foreign materials, nonmetallic casket
material, dental work, or eyeglasses that were cremated with the human
remains but excluding any prosthetic or medical device.
(b) The term includes hydrolyzed remains.
SECTION 10. IC 23-14-31-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. As used in this
chapter, "cremation" or "cremate" means the following:
(1) The:
(A) incineration of:
(i) the body of a deceased person individual; or
(ii) a body part of a nondeceased person individual; and
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


(B) the mechanical or manual reduction of identifiable bone
fragments to unidentifiable bone fragments.
(2) Alkaline hydrolysis.
SECTION 11. IC 23-14-31-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) As used in this
chapter, "cremation chamber" means the enclosed space where the
cremation takes place.
(b) The term includes an alkaline hydrolysis chamber.
SECTION 12. IC 23-14-31-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) As used in this
chapter, "cremation room" means the room where the cremation
chamber is located.
(b) The term includes an alkaline hydrolysis room.
SECTION 13. IC 23-14-31-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) As used in this
chapter, "crematory" means a building or structure, including a holding
facility where human remains are or are intended to be cremated.
(b) The term includes an alkaline hydrolysis facility.
SECTION 14. IC 23-14-31-16.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16.1. As used in this chapter,
"hydrolyzed remains" means all human remains recovered after
the completion of alkaline hydrolysis, including the residue of any
foreign materials, dental work, or eyeglasses that were with the
human remains when alkaline hydrolysis was conducted. The term
does not include the following:
(1) A prosthetic.
(2) A medical device.
(3) Any liquid substance remaining after alkaline hydrolysis.
SECTION 15. IC 23-14-31-21.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21.5. For purposes of the law
governing cremation, a reference to cremation includes the process
of alkaline hydrolysis.
SECTION 16. IC 23-14-31-35.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 35.5. (a) A crematory authority
may not do the following:
(1) Require that human remains be placed in a casket before,
or for the performance of, alkaline hydrolysis.
(2) Refuse to accept unembalmed human remains for alkaline
hydrolysis on the basis of the lack of embalming.
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


(3) Accept a casket or an alternative container on which there
is evidence of the leakage of body fluids.
(b) If human remains are not delivered in a casket to a
crematory for alkaline hydrolysis, the human remains must be in
an alternative container or single use human remains pouch that:
(1) is made of a consumable material;
(2) may be closed adequately to provide a complete covering
for the human remains;
(3) is resistant to leakage or spillage;
(4) may be handled with ease; and
(5) provides protection for the health, safety, and personal
integrity of crematory personnel.
SECTION 17. IC 23-14-31-45.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 45.5. A crematory authority
shall:
(1) obtain federal, state, and local permits governing the
disposal of any liquid substance remaining after the
performance of alkaline hydrolysis; and
(2) dispose of any liquid substance remaining after the
performance of alkaline hydrolysis in compliance with any
federal, state, and local requirements governing the disposal
of the liquid substance.
SECTION 18. IC 23-14-31-54 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 54. The board may adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter.
SECTION 19. IC 23-14-33-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. For purposes of the law
governing funeral services and cremation, a reference to cremation
includes the process of alkaline hydrolysis.
SECTION 20. IC 23-14-33-14 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. "Cremation" means:
(1) the incineration of:
(A) the body of a deceased individual; or
(B) a body part of a nondeceased individual; and
(2) the mechanical or manual reduction of identifiable bone
fragments to unidentifiable bone fragments. or "cremate" has
the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 21. IC 23-14-33-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. "Crematory" means
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


a building or structure, including a holding facility, within which the
remains of deceased individuals:
(1) are; or
(2) are intended to be;
cremated. has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-11.
SECTION 22. IC 23-14-42.5-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremate" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 23. IC 23-14-54-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremate" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 24. IC 23-14-54.5-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremated remains" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-7.
SECTION 25. IC 23-14-55-0.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.3. As used in this chapter,
"cremated remains" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-7.
SECTION 26. IC 23-14-55-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremation" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 27. IC 23-14-57-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremate" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 28. IC 23-14-59-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremated remains" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-7.
SECTION 29. IC 25-1-5-4.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.16-2022,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) The agency's duties and functions under
this chapter include developing and maintaining a system that allows
an individual who is applying for:
(1) an initial license or certificate; or
(2) the renewal of an existing license or certificate;
to become a donor of an anatomical gift (as defined by
IC 29-2-16.1-1(3)).
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


(b) The agency shall place the information of an individual who
elects to become a donor of an anatomical gift in a donor registry (as
defined by IC 29-2-16.1-1(9)). IC 29-2-16.1-1(10)).
(c) An individual authorized to make an anatomical gift under
IC 29-2-16.1 may amend or revoke an anatomical gift under
IC 29-2-16.1-5. However, the agency's system under subsection (a) is
not required to amend or remove a donor's decision to make an
anatomical gift from the registry if the individual at a later time amends
or revokes their decision to be a donor.
(d) The system developed under this section must comply with the
requirements under IC 29-2-16.1.
SECTION 30. IC 25-1-6-4.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.16-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) The licensing agency's duties and
functions under this chapter include developing and maintaining a
system that allows an individual who is applying for:
(1) an initial license or certificate; or
(2) the renewal of an existing license or certificate;
to become a donor of an anatomical gift (as defined by
IC 29-2-16.1-1(3)).
(b) The licensing agency shall place the information of an individual
who elects to become a donor of an anatomical gift in a donor registry
(as defined by IC 29-2-16.1-1(9)). IC 29-2-16.1-1(10)).
(c) An individual authorized to make an anatomical gift under
IC 29-2-16.1 may amend or revoke an anatomical gift under
IC 29-2-16.1-5. However, the licensing agency's system under
subsection (a) is not required to amend or remove a donor's decision to
make an anatomical gift from the registry if the individual at a later
time amends or revokes their decision to be a donor.
(d) The system developed under this section must comply with the
requirements under IC 29-2-16.1.
SECTION 31. IC 25-15-2-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. "Cremate" means to
incinerate human remains and to mechanically or manually reduce the
bone fragments of the remains to unidentifiable bone fragments. or
"cremation" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 32. IC 25-15-2-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. "Cremated remains" has the
meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-7.
SECTION 33. IC 25-15-2-6.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.6. "Crematory" has the
meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-11.
SECTION 34. IC 25-15-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Alkaline Hydrolysis
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 23-14-31 apply throughout this
chapter.
Sec. 2. The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 concerning
alkaline hydrolysis, including the following:
(1) Regulation of alkaline hydrolysis facilities containing
equipment designed for alkaline hydrolysis of human remains.
(2) Regulation of alkaline hydrolysis chambers.
(3) Regulation of the pulverizing of bone fragments to an
unidentifiable dimension after alkaline hydrolysis.
(4) Setting standards for disposition of hydrolyzed remains
that result from pulverization, where the hydrolyzed remains
are reduced to unidentifiable dimensions.
(5) Setting standards for:
(A) the dignified transportation of human remains for
alkaline hydrolysis;
(B) any equipment or container used in alkaline
hydrolysis; and
(C) the disposal of hydrolyzed remains.
(6) Exclusive use of any chamber, container, or other
equipment used in alkaline hydrolysis of human remains.
(7) Supervision of alkaline hydrolysis by a funeral director
who is licensed under this article.
SECTION 35. IC 29-2-16.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.50-2021,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this
chapter:
(1) "Adult" means an individual at least eighteen (18) years of
age.
(2) "Agent" means an individual who is:
(A) authorized to make health care decisions on behalf of
another person by a health care power of attorney under
IC 30-5-5-16 or a health care representative under IC 16-36-7;
or
(B) expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on behalf
of another person by a document signed by the person.
(3) "Anatomical gift" means a donation of all or part of a human
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


body to take effect after the donor's death for the purpose of
transplantation, therapy, research, or education.
(4) "Bank" or "storage facility" means a facility licensed,
accredited, or approved under the laws of any state for storage of
human bodies or parts of human bodies.
(5) "Cremation" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
(5) (6) "Decedent":
(A) means a deceased individual whose body or body part is
or may be the source of an anatomical gift; and
(B) includes:
(i) a stillborn infant; and
(ii) except as restricted by any other law, a fetus.
(6) (7) "Disinterested witness" means an individual other than a
spouse, child, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the
individual who makes, amends, revokes, or refuses to make an
anatomical gift or another adult who exhibited special care and
concern for the individual. This term does not include a person to
whom an anatomical gift could pass under section 10 of this
chapter.
(7) (8) "Document of gift" means a donor card or other record
used to make an anatomical gift, including a statement or symbol
on:
(A) a driver's license;
(B) an identification card;
(C) a resident license to hunt, fish, or trap; or
(D) a donor registry.
(8) (9) "Donor" means an individual whose body or body part is
the subject of an anatomical gift.
(9) (10) "Donor registry" means:
(A) a data base maintained by:
(i) the bureau of motor vehicles; or
(ii) the equivalent agency in another state;
(B) the Donate Life Indiana Registry maintained by the
Indiana Donation Alliance Foundation; or
(C) a donor registry maintained in another state;
that contains records of anatomical gifts and amendments to or
revocations of anatomical gifts.
(10) (11) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by
the bureau of motor vehicles to operate a vehicle.
(11) (12) "Eye bank" means a person that is licensed, accredited,
or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery,
screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of human
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


eyes or portions of human eyes.
(12) (13) "Guardian" means an individual appointed by a court to
make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, or
welfare of an individual. The term does not include a guardian ad
litem.
(13) (14) "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital under
the laws of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the
United States, a state, or a subdivision of a state.
(14) (15) "Identification card" means an identification card issued
by the bureau of motor vehicles.
(15) (16) "Minor" means an individual under eighteen (18) years
of age.
(16) (17) "Organ procurement organization" means a person
designated by the Secretary of the United States Department of
Health and Human Services as an organ procurement
organization.
(17) (18) "Parent" means an individual whose parental rights have
not been terminated.
(18) (19) "Part" means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human
being. The term does not mean a whole body.
(19) (20) "Pathologist" means a physician:
(A) certified by the American Board of Pathology; or
(B) holding an unlimited license to practice medicine in
Indiana and acting under the direction of a physician certified
by the American Board of Pathology.
(20) (21) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company,
association, joint venture, public corporation, government or
governmental subdivision, agency, instrumentality, or any other
legal or commercial entity.
(21) (22) "Physician" or "surgeon" means an individual authorized
to practice medicine or osteopathy under the laws of any state.
(22) (23) "Procurement organization" means an eye bank, organ
procurement organization, or tissue bank.
(23) (24) "Prospective donor" means an individual who is dead or
near death and has been determined by a procurement
organization to have a part that could be medically suitable for
transplantation, therapy, research, or education. The term does not
include an individual who has made an appropriate refusal.
(24) (25) "Reasonably available" means:
(A) able to be contacted by a procurement organization
without undue effort; and
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


(B) willing and able to act in a timely manner consistent with
existing medical criteria necessary for the making of an
anatomical gift.
(25) (26) "Recipient" means an individual into whose body a
decedent's part has been or is intended to be transplanted.
(26) (27) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium
and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(27) (28) "Refusal" means a record created under section 6 of this
chapter that expressly states the intent to bar another person from
making an anatomical gift of an individual's body or part.
(28) (29) "Sign" means, with the present intent to authenticate or
adopt a record:
(A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(B) to attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process.
(29) (30) "State" means a state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(30) (31) "Technician" means an individual determined to be
qualified to remove or process parts by an appropriate
organization that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under
federal or state law. The term includes an eye enucleator.
(31) (32) "Tissue" means a part of the human body other than an
organ or an eye. The term does not include blood or other bodily
fluids unless the blood or bodily fluids are donated for the
purpose of research or education.
(32) (33) "Tissue bank" means a person that is licensed,
accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the
recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of
tissue.
(33) (34) "Transplant hospital" means a hospital that furnishes
organ transplants and other medical and surgical specialty
services required for the care of organ transplant patients.
SECTION 36. IC 29-2-19-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremation" or "cremate" has the meaning set forth in
IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 37. IC 29-2-19-0.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.7. As used in this chapter,
"cremated remains" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-7.
SECTION 38. IC 30-2-13-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. As used in this chapter,
"cremation" or "cremate" has the meaning set forth in
IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 39. IC 30-2-13-4.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. As used in this chapter,
"crematory" has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-11.
SECTION 40. IC 35-31.5-2-72.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 72.7. "Cremation", for purposes
of IC 35-50-5-3, has the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 41. IC 36-1-2-4.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.1. As used in this chapter, "cremated remains" has
the meaning set forth in IC 23-14-31-7.
SECTION 42. IC 36-1-2-4.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.2. "Cremation" or "cremate" has the meaning set
forth in IC 23-14-31-8.
SECTION 43. IC 36-1-2-4.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.4. "Crematory" has the meaning set forth in
IC 23-14-31-11.
SECTION 44. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The state
board of funeral and cemetery service shall adopt the rules
described in IC 25-15-11-2, as added by this act, not later than July
1, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 45. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1240—LS 6637/DI 150